test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nooqgw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nǭʼgõ: # Noun 119 'eng /est nahk/fin' - full paradigm
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Nom: nǭʼgõ
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Gen: nǭʼgõ
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Par: nǭʼgõ
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Dat: nǭʼgõn
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Ins: nǭʼgõks
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Ill: [nǭʼgõz, nǭʼgõ]
     nǭʼgõ+N+Sg+Ela: nǭʼgõst
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Nom: nǭʼgõd
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Gen: nǭʼgõd
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Par: nǭʼgidi
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Dat: nǭʼgõdõn
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Ins: nǭʼgõdõks
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Ill: nǭʼgiž
     nǭʼgõ+N+Pl+Ela: nǭʼgist
